District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.14

Waiver of notice of meeting.

(a)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may waive any required notice of a meeting of the board of directors in a record before, during, or after the meeting.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director’s participation in a meeting shall be a waiver of notice of that meeting unless the director:

(1)

Objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director’s arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken at the meeting; or

(2)

Promptly objects upon the introduction of any matter for which notice under § 29-1008.13 has not been given and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken on the matter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09 and § 29-1008.15.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 814 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition